assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX  errar irralo errar
SFX  errar irralos errar
SFX  etar itala etar
SFX  etar italas etar
SFX  etar italo etar
SFX  etar italos etar
SFX  iar ala iar
SFX  iar alas iar
SFX  iar alo iar
SFX  iar alos iar
SFX  obar ubala obar
SFX  obar ubalas obar
SFX  obar ubalo obar
SFX  obar ubalos obar
SFX  ocer ucela ocer
SFX  ocer ucelas ocer
SFX  ocer ucelo ocer
SFX  ocer ucelos ocer
SFX  oltar ultala oltar
SFX  oltar ultalas oltar
SFX  oltar ultalo oltar
SFX  oltar ultalos oltar
SFX  olver ulvela olver
SFX  olver ulvelas olver
SFX  olver ulvelo olver
SFX  olver ulvelos olver
SFX  ontar untala ontar
SFX  ontar untalas ontar
SFX  ontar untalo ontar
SFX  ontar untalos ontar
SFX  ostrar ustrala ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustralas ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustralo ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustralos ostrar

SFX  Y 24
SFX  ecer ceme ecer
SFX  ecer cenos ecer
SFX  r dme r
SFX  r dnos r
SFX  ender indeme ender
SFX  ender indenos ender
SFX  entar intame entar
SFX  entar intanos entar
SFX  errar irrame errar
SFX  errar irranos errar
SFX  etar itame etar
SFX  etar itanos etar
SFX  iar ame iar
SFX  iar anos iar
SFX  oltar ultame oltar
SFX  oltar ultanos oltar
SFX  olver ulveme olver
SFX  olver ulvenos olver
SFX  ontar untame ontar
SFX  ontar untanos ontar
SFX  order urdeme order
SFX  order urdenos order
SFX  ostrar ustrame ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustranos ostrar

SFX  Y 20
SFX  ecer cele ecer
SFX  ecer celes ecer
SFX  r dle r
SFX  r dles r
SFX  egar igale egar
SFX  egar igales egar
SFX  ender indele ender
SFX  ender indeles ender
SFX  errar irrale errar
SFX  errar irrales errar
SFX  iar ale iar
SFX  iar ales iar
SFX  ogar ugale ogar
SFX  ogar ugales ogar
SFX  ontar untale ontar
SFX  ontar untales ontar
SFX  order urdele order
SFX  order urdeles order
SFX  ostrar ustrale ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustrales ostrar

SFX  Y 96
SFX  ecer cemela ecer
SFX  ecer cemelas ecer
SFX  ecer cemelo ecer
SFX  ecer cemelos ecer
SFX  ecer cenosla ecer
SFX  ecer cenoslas ecer
SFX  ecer cenoslo ecer
SFX  ecer cenoslos ecer
SFX  ecer cesela ecer
SFX  ecer ceselas ecer
SFX  ecer ceselo ecer
SFX  ecer ceselos ecer
SFX  er dmela er
SFX  er dmelas er
SFX  er dmelo er
SFX  er dmelos er
SFX  er dnosla er
SFX  er dnoslas er
SFX  er dnoslo er
SFX  er dnoslos er
SFX  er dsela er
SFX  er dselas er
SFX  er dselo er
SFX  er dselos er
SFX  iar amela iar
SFX  iar amelas iar
SFX  iar amelo iar
SFX  iar amelos iar
SFX  iar anosla iar
SFX  iar anoslas iar
SFX  iar anoslo iar
SFX  iar anoslos iar
SFX  iar asela iar
SFX  iar aselas iar
SFX  iar aselo iar
SFX  iar aselos iar
SFX  ar dmela ar
SFX  ar dmelas ar
SFX  ar dmelo ar
SFX  ar dmelos ar
SFX  ar dnosla ar
SFX  ar dnoslas ar
SFX  ar dnoslo ar
SFX  ar dnoslos ar
SFX  ar dsela ar
SFX  ar dselas ar
SFX  ar dselo ar
SFX  ar dselos ar
SFX  olver ulvemela olver
SFX  olver ulvemelas olver
SFX  olver ulvemelo olver
SFX  olver ulvemelos olver
SFX  olver ulvenosla olver
SFX  olver ulvenoslas olver
SFX  olver ulvenoslo olver
SFX  olver ulvenoslos olver
SFX  olver ulvesela olver
SFX  olver ulveselas olver
SFX  olver ulveselo olver
SFX  olver ulveselos olver
SFX  ontar untamela ontar
SFX  ontar untamelas ontar
SFX  ontar untamelo ontar
SFX  ontar untamelos ontar
SFX  ontar untanosla ontar
SFX  ontar untanoslas ontar
SFX  ontar untanoslo ontar
SFX  ontar untanoslos ontar
SFX  ontar untasela ontar
SFX  ontar untaselas ontar
SFX  ontar untaselo ontar
SFX  ontar untaselos ontar
SFX  ordar urdamela ordar
SFX  ordar urdamelas ordar
SFX  ordar urdamelo ordar
SFX  ordar urdamelos ordar
SFX  ordar urdanosla ordar
SFX  ordar urdanoslas ordar
SFX  ordar urdanoslo ordar
SFX  ordar urdanoslos ordar
SFX  ordar urdasela ordar
SFX  ordar urdaselas ordar
SFX  ordar urdaselo ordar
SFX  ordar urdaselos ordar
SFX  ostrar ustramela ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustramelas ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustramelo ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustramelos ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustranosla ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustranoslas ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustranoslo ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustranoslos ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustrasela ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustraselas ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustraselo ostrar
SFX  ostrar ustraselos ostrar

SFX  Y 56
SFX  aer ela aer
SFX  aer elas aer
SFX  aer elo aer
SFX  aer elos aer
SFX  r dla r
SFX  r dlas r
SFX  r dlo r
SFX  r dlos r
SFX  cer zla cer
SFX  cer zlas cer
SFX  cer zlo cer
SFX  cer zlos cer
SFX  ecir cela ecir
SFX  ecir celas ecir
SFX  ecir celo ecir
SFX  ecir celos ecir
SFX  edir dela edir
SFX  edir delas edir
SFX  edir delo edir
SFX  edir delos edir
SFX  eguir guela eguir
SFX  eguir guelas eguir
SFX  eguir guelo eguir
SFX  eguir guelos eguir
SFX  er ela er
SFX  er elas er
SFX  er elo er
SFX  er elos er
SFX  entir intela entir
SFX  entir intelas entir
SFX  entir intelo entir
SFX  entir intelos entir
SFX  erer irela erer
SFX  erer irelas erer
SFX  erer irelo erer
SFX  erer irelos erer
SFX  er la ner
SFX  er las ner
SFX  er lo ner
SFX  er los ner
SFX  ertir irtela ertir
SFX  ertir irtelas ertir
SFX  ertir irtelo ertir
SFX  ertir irtelos ertir
SFX  ervir rvela ervir
SFX  ervir rvelas ervir
SFX  ervir rvelo ervir
SFX  ervir rvelos ervir
SFX  r la ver
SFX  r las ver
SFX  r lo ver
SFX  r los ver
SFX  uir yelas uir
SFX  uir yela uir
SFX  uir yelos uir
SFX  uir yelo uir

SFX  Y 26
SFX  aber beme aber
SFX  aber benos aber
SFX  r dme r
SFX  r dnos r
SFX  aer eme aer
SFX  aer enos aer
SFX  ecir ceme ecir
SFX  ecir cenos ecir
SFX  edir deme edir
SFX  edir denos edir
SFX  egir geme egir
SFX  egir genos egir
SFX  eguir gueme eguir
SFX  eguir guenos eguir
SFX  erer ireme erer
SFX  erer irenos erer
SFX  erir ireme erir
SFX  erir irenos erir
SFX  er me ner
SFX  er nos ner
SFX  estir steme estir
SFX  estir stenos estir
SFX  r me ver
SFX  r nos ver
SFX  ucir ceme ucir
SFX  ucir cenos ucir

SFX  Y 14
SFX  aber bele aber
SFX  aber beles aber
SFX  r dle r
SFX  r dles r
SFX  aer ele aer
SFX  aer eles aer
SFX  cer zle cer
SFX  cer zles cer
SFX  edir dele edir
SFX  edir deles edir
SFX  er le ner
SFX  er les ner
SFX  r le ver
SFX  r les ver

SFX  Y 60
SFX  aer emela aer
SFX  aer emelas aer
SFX  aer emelo aer
SFX  aer emelos aer
SFX  aer enosla aer
SFX  aer enoslas aer
SFX  aer enoslo aer
SFX  aer enoslos aer
SFX  aer esela aer
SFX  aer eselas aer
SFX  aer eselo aer
SFX  aer eselos aer
SFX  er dmela er
SFX  er dmelas er
SFX  er dmelo er
SFX  er dmelos er
SFX  er dnosla er
SFX  er dnoslas er
SFX  er dnoslo er
SFX  er dnoslos er
SFX  er dsela er
SFX  er dselas er
SFX  er dselo er
SFX  er dselos er
SFX  edir demela edir
SFX  edir demelas edir
SFX  edir demelo edir
SFX  edir demelos edir
SFX  edir denosla edir
SFX  edir denoslas edir
SFX  edir denoslo edir
SFX  edir denoslos edir
SFX  edir desela edir
SFX  edir deselas edir
SFX  edir deselo edir
SFX  edir deselos edir
SFX  ir dmela ir
SFX  ir dmelas ir
SFX  ir dmelo ir
SFX  ir dmelos ir
SFX  ir dnosla ir
SFX  ir dnoslas ir
SFX  ir dnoslo ir
SFX  ir dnoslos ir
SFX  ir dsela ir
SFX  ir dselas ir
SFX  ir dselo ir
SFX  ir dselos ir
SFX  oner nmela oner
SFX  oner nmelas oner
SFX  oner nmelo oner
SFX  oner nmelos oner
SFX  oner nnosla oner
SFX  oner nnoslas oner
SFX  oner nnoslo oner
SFX  oner nnoslos oner
SFX  oner nsela oner
SFX  oner nselas oner
SFX  oner nselo oner
SFX  oner nselos oner

SFX  Y 664
SFX  acar quela acar
SFX  acar quelas acar
SFX  acar quelo acar
SFX  acar quelos acar
SFX  acar quenla acar
SFX  acar quenlas acar
SFX  acar quenlo acar
SFX  acar quenlos acar
SFX  achar chela achar
SFX  achar chelas achar
SFX  achar chelo achar
SFX  achar chelos achar
SFX  achar chenla achar
SFX  achar chenlas achar
SFX  achar chenlo achar
SFX  achar chenlos achar
SFX  adar dela adar
SFX  adar delas adar
SFX  adar delo adar
SFX  adar delos adar
SFX  adar denla adar
SFX  adar denlas adar
SFX  adar denlo adar
SFX  adar denlos adar
SFX  agar guela agar
SFX  agar guelas agar
SFX  agar guelo agar
SFX  agar guelos agar
SFX  agar guenla agar
SFX  agar guenlas agar
SFX  agar guenlo agar
SFX  agar guenlos agar
SFX  ajar jela ajar
SFX  ajar jelas ajar
SFX  ajar jelo ajar
SFX  ajar jelos ajar
SFX  ajar jenla ajar
SFX  ajar jenlas ajar
